Biker reacts lightning fast and prevents worse
On Friday evening, a accident on the road between Machtolsheim and Merklingen was a accident in which a motorcyclist was only injured due to his quick reaction.
Driist overlooks Biker Biker
A 44 year-old old driver wanted to turn around 21.30 with her VW coming from Merklingen to turn left on Landesstraße 1230 towards Machtolsheim.
Here she overlooked the 24-year-old motordrivers from the direction of Nellingen.
During the collision, hand and foot brake levers fly away
The biker still tried to avoid the car, still striit at the rear vehicle area.
The stripping process, the hand and foot brake ver the zuki demolished and the driver was no longer stop.
At the, he controlled his motorcycle in the green stifen next to the road and let it roll out there without falling.
Biker suffers leg injury
Due the clash with the car, the biker suffered an injury at the Bei and had to be treated in a clinic.
Mamming: Corona mass infection: 174 harvest assistinfected
After a Corona mass infection on a large vegetable farm in Mamming, Mamming, almost 500 people are under quarantined and are no longer leave the plant.
A security service monitors the ban
A total of 174 harvest assistpers were positively in the line investigation for the Corona pathogen Sars-CoV-2, as the District Office Dingolfing-Landau reported on Saturday evening.
"Unfortunately avoid further spread, we have to take this step to protect the population," said district rat Werner Bumeder (CSU).
Previously, seven employees had infected in the company this was the occasion of the series
The farm is a large vegetable farm that cultivates strawberries, cucumbers, cabbage and beetets - the cucumbers only for glasses.
Mamming is a rural community with more over 3300 inhabitants not far from Dingolfing with its large BMW plant.
Bumeder appealed to the citizens to maintain peace: "According to our information, it is a closed group of people".
On the farm, infected were infected by uninfected employees, the site is now surrounded by a barrier fence.
Greens and SPD gave joint responsibility to the state government.
The two opposition factions accused Prime Minister Markus Söder (CSU) and his cabinet of neglecting the control the accommodation of seasonal workers.
"This can be bitter revenge if such local infection events take out and regional lockdowns have to be ordered," said Jürgen Mistol, the parliamentary Managing Director of the Greens.
The SPD sees this similar very similar: "After the after the Corona outbreak in the Wiesenhof slaughterthof, we have already for a special control program for farms with harvest assistpers," said environmental expert Florian von Brunn.
"Especially the hygiene conditions at the workplace and the housing conditions must be strictly controlled from our view.
This obviously did not happen ".
The outbreak had come "with announcement".
Metro station Aidenbachstraße: Dangerous dispute: 19-year-old old falls the track bed after Schubser
In a dispute between two youth groups at the Aidenbachstraße station, a 19-year-old has fallen through a pushwer and slides into the track bed.
Obersendling - On Friday, at the U-Bahn station Aidenbachstraße station at 16.15, was a dispute between two youth groups.
A passers-by alarmed the police, who moved with several stripes.
According to the first investigations, a Munich (17) pushed a 19-year-old to the ground.
The young man slipped over the edge of the platform and fell into the track bed.
People from the group of the 17-year-old helped the fallen out of the track
There was no danger of a railway.
As the police reported, clashes between the two people.
The 17-year-old initially fled from the crime scene, but his personal could be found later.
He accompanied by his father he went to police 29.
Against the 17-year-old old is determined for body injury.
Report: Seehofer urges for longer data
Data data storage is currently exposed.
However, Federal of Interior Horst Seehofer calls for a media report an extension of the storage period.
He wants to strengthen the fight against child abuse
Federal Minister of Interior Horst Seehofer (CSU) calls for a media report for an extended data storage instead of the planned ten weeks a half year.
As the "Bild on Sonntag" reports, Seehofer asked Minister of Justice Christine Lambrecht (SPD) in a letter for a quick change.
Seehofer therefore wants to strengthen the measures against child abuse.
He considers it is sense to "make urgently necessary adjustments in the law now," the newspaper quotes from the letter.
Currently, data storage is currently exposed.
A decision of the ECJ is expected is expected.
But Seehofer wants the changes advance so that they could be applied immediately after a possible positive judgment, the report continues.
A spokesman of the Ministry of Justice told the newspaper that it could be meaningbly examined whether it requires legal adjustments if the courts had decided.
In the fight against child abuse and child pornography, Seehofer had together with the ministers of the countries had advocfor data storage in June.
NBA: Stripclub anger for Clippers star Lou Williams
Excitement in the NBA
Lou Williams (33), basketball professional of the Los Angeles Clippers, said to have left the tournament district in Disney World in Orlando / Florida, with permission for a funeral.
According to US media reports, he visited the evening visited the strip club "Magic City" in Atlanta.
Williams, who has have admitted the visit to ESPN information, is back in isloation, is tested daily on Covid-19.
His reason for visiting: Chicken Wings.
In February last year, "Sweet Lou", as is called in the NBA, already expressed his love for exactly these Wings.
The American wrote: "Magic City and Blue Flame (another strip club in Atlanta, usually) have the best wings in the city".
NBA Insider Shams Charania announced on Twitter on Twitter that the NBA Williams ordered a ten-day quarantine.
This, the Clippers star miss the first two official games after the test game.
In Disney World, the NBA wants to play the Corona season.
Currently, the best 22 teams with training games are preparing for the season finale that which in the night on Friday.
Söder expresses after the mass infecton on the Corona situation
Munich - Minister of Health Melanie Huml (CSU) has already announced a test offensive for large farms on Sunday.
The press conference will be shown live on our homepage
The case in Mamming in Dingolfing-Landau has shockared authorities and politics.
On the large vegetable farm is currently working almost 500 harvest assistpers from several countries, more than a third has been infected with the Corona pathogen.
The farm is now under quarantine and is closed with a fence
No one must leave the premises, food will be delivered.
The the over 3300 inhabitants of the municipality are now offer free Corona tests
Since the harvest assistpers had little contact with the local population, the District Office has so to assumed that the infections have not spread beyond the farm.
"Conscience Conscience": confession of the alleged arson of Nantes
"My client has been cooperative," lawyer Quentin Chabert told the
The defender added: "He regrets the eds, the confession was a liberation for him.
His mandate was "plagued by bes and was taken away by the extent of destruction".
In the case of convicnation, the man to the prosecution aten ten years prison and a fine of EUR 150,000.
The Gothic St. Peter and Paul Cathedral in Nantes had severseriously damaged by a fire the night on Saturday last week.
The fire had broken out in three distant places in the church.
Laboratory tests hardenthe suspicion of arson.
The now arrested suspect had already been arrested a few hours after the fire.
He was released after a day.
The man works as a volunteer for the diocese of Nantes and was responsible the closure of the cathedral on the eve of the fire.
Since there was no trace of violent penetration into the church, he was quickly to the investigators.
Discuss the abolition of the 50 + 1 rule
Former DFB President Reinhard Grindel has recommended to consider the abolition of the 50 + 1 rule.
"German football should at least discuss to set conditions and clear rules for investors before the EU Commission creates completed facts," said Grindel the "Image on Sunday".
He emphasized: "For the clubs that are most to dangerous to Bavaria and Dortmund, the 50 + 1 rules do not work, anyway: see Leipzig or Leverkusen.
In this respect, one is not around the debate whether it is not necessary to facilitate clubs that want to break into this phalanx facilitate the involvement of investors ".
However, he doubts whether there is the willin the German Football League to allow majority shares that are prohibited by the 50 + 1 rule.
"It remains a legal risk to draw investment fin a European internal market around the business location Bundesliga," said Grindel.
The former DFB boss sees the danger that "the attempts to ensure more competitive balance in the Bundesliga, will only weaken the competitiveness of our top clubs at European level, but not lead to more tension in the championship".
Even a equal distribution of the TV funds would not achieve a decisive effect.
"FC Bayern makes sales of 750 million euros, Borussia Dortmund of 500 million and RB Leipzig of 300 million.
So the differences are already alone among the first three clubs already immense.
The other 15 clubs have an average budget of 130 million, "the 58-year-old
Looking looking of the past, Grindel feels betrayed.
"Unfortunately, there were people who have noticed this mistake and pced to the press, instead of addresme," Grindel said about the adoption of an expensive clock that had led to his resignation in April 2019.
"This has already me humanly".
He gift of about 11,000 euros he received from a Ukrainian official.
"I committed a compliance breach, and it was right to draw the consequences from," said Grindel.
"With the ominous watch gift I handled completely transparent and suspeless
Many knew in the DFB ".
He had never "made a secret of the gift," said the 58-year-old assured.
"This may be called naive, in any case, this form of transparency was the was the complete opposite of corruption".
"Black Lives Matter": Wounded and a dead
The protests against police in the United States have increased by Donald Trump's of federal police in several cities.
On Saturday, clashes between demonstrators and police emen in various cities.
In Louisville, three people were injured, 16 people were arrested in Seattle.
In Austin, a person was killed by shots while a demonstration train just crossed a crossing.
Previously, clashes in Portland during protests against racism and police violence.
The security forces, including officials from the federal police used tear gas on the night of Saturday and violciently ated demonstrators.
Hundreds of partly armed demonstrators marched through Louisville in Kentucky on Saturday and that the responsible to be held responsible for the death of Breonna Taylor.
The 26year year-old student was shot in March at a drug raid in her home in Louisville.
The aim of the raid was someone else who did not live there, and no drugs were found.
When on Saturday a member of a group that calls itself as an armed alliance of black Americans shot a, three people were injured.
According to the NBC, they were taken to the hospital.
None of them floated in life danger.
The police established barricades because counterdemonstresters of a white militia.
The two meeting of the two groups did not meet.
In Austin, Texas, a person was shot and died of a "Black Lives Matter" demonstration.
The police took a suspect a suspect.
More details information on the circumstances of the crime has not so yet.
Mayor Steve Adler told according to the "New York Times" that he, how many in the city, was "uncomforting and stunned" because of what had happened.
In the American metropolis Seattle, demonstrators also clashes with the police on Saturday.
They put construction car in fire front of a youth prison, the police used blade grenades and pepper spray.
According to the Seattle Times, 16 people were arrested for resistance to police or body injury
In the city of Oakland, California, a courthouse was set on fire.
A small group of demonstrators had hit windows, shot down fireworks, and police officers blinded with lasers, the Oakland on late Saturday evening (local time).
The fire could be extinguished.
In Aurora, a suburb of Denver, Colorado, a car drove through a crowd that demonstrdemonstrated on a highway.
As the police reported, one of the demonstrators fired a weapon and at least one person was taken to the hospital to the hospital.
In addition, windows were also aten in a court, and a fire was laid, as the police reported.
Investigation were.
Rakoczy in Bad Kissingen: Historical costumes defy Corona
Although the great break was missing in the spa town, visitors and actors enjoyed the Rakoczzy flair of the alternative program.
It was unusual for visitors, performers and organizers: the Rakoczzy weekend without a Rakoczy festival.
But: even if the big party mile was in the city centre, the crowds and program highpoints such as Saale, Rakoczyball or Festzug, many came their money in the Corona-compliant alternative program.
"I think we managed to spread Rakoczzy flair," says course director Sylvie Thormann.
The guests would have accepted it well.
In principle, one return to the beginnings of the Rakoczy Festival, and also only the historones were in the focus of the festival.
Pleasant atmosphere
Vesna Konhäuser has visited her husband for more than 25 years to the Rakoczy-Festival Bad Kissingen.
So this time in the Corona year.
The couple has made comfortable at the Luitpold Casino, watching the historans while strorolling and listening to the Cuban live music at the casino restaurant.
"I find it so pleasant," says Konhäuser.
She miss not miss crowds that otherwise belong to Rakoczy.
But, you not missing the usual program highlights, especially Saale burns on Friday evening as well as the historic festival and the fireworks on Sunday evening.
"This's already a pity.
The weather would have been great this year, "she says.
Rakoczy riding tournament is to take place again
For the actors of the historical spa guests, the alternative program meant more work.
For example for Christina Gold, who contributes in the maression in a normal year and can be seen on the carriage of the Kurgarten café.
This year she was travelling on Saturdays and Sundays in costume in the city.
"This's already more exhausting, otherwise we have it easier," she says.
The equriding club had less to do, even if individual riders were in the park.
"We very much hope that the riding quadrille will take place again the coming year," says the chairman Ulrike Waldhofen.
She announced that after several years of break in 2021, a Rakoczy riding tournament take place.
28 Corona cases in Spanish Fuenlabrada
The Spanish football second player CF Fuenlabrada is slides ever deeper into the crisis due to a Corona outbreak.
Since the newcomer from near Madrid, despite the first Corona cases on 20 July had to a to the city of A Coruña, a deep low follows the next.
By Sunday, 28 players or team members had been positively, one came to the hospital as the club.
Fuenlabrada from the city of the same name southwest of Madrid has still had the chance to reach the promotion playoffs.
Now even threatens to desto the B group of the Second League.
The game against Deportivo La Coruña last Monday was cancelled at the last moment, the prosecutor investigcharged for a possible offense against public health, the top sports authority CSD is considering the forced descent of the club.
The players and other team members are quarantined in a hotel
"Until the sixth day of the quarantine they have not received a fresh towel and no gel," wrote the sports newspaper "AS".
On photos, to see how players had hung underwear and club clothing in their rooms in the hotel in for dry after they apparently had to wash them themselves.
The linen were not changed for five days.
Another problem is the food.
Neither it good nor sufficient, wrote "AS"
The club, the club announced that you were satisfied with the hotel.
The allegation of deliberately angered public health was rejected the lawyer of the club, Javier Tebas Llanas.
They had not violated the Corona rules by the football association, stressed the son of the president of the Spanish Primera Division, Javier Tebas, as the Europa Press and the sports newspaper "Marca reported.
Before the departure there were four infected until 19 July, but all isolated and not.
Right before the flight on Monday to A Coruña, all players and team members have been tested again.
When the team was already in A Coruña, "five or six" other team members of the Corona.
The game was cancelled 60 minutes before the whistle, said Tebas Llanas.
Police must to capture horses n horses the steam partment
Two animals were on the road
The police took her back to her owner.
On Sunday morning just before 6 a.00, a road user shared two free-running horses on the eder between the junction of Donnersdorf / Steinsfeld and the motorway junction point Theres.
When the officers were arrived, the horses were already between the eder and the village Dampfach.
After the confidence the horses could the shortly before steam partment, they were to a rope carried in the strip car.
Cycling professional Tony Martin: Career continuation
Time trial specialist Tony Martin thinks about a continuation of his career.
Frankfurt / Main - The seven time world champion Tony Martin can imagine continuing his cycling career.
"I am currently off the framework with the team, how and in what form it could continue," said the 35-year-old of the Frankfurter Allgemeine Sonntagszeitung.
Martin is currently employed with the Dutch team Jumbo-Visma and had before the Corona break, had considered to ending his career after this year.
Negotiations with his team were also about the number of racing days, he said.
Or about other problems that would ague him as a family father, said Martin.
He used to get up after a fall, and the first thought was: "Fast back to the wheel.
Today I think as the father of a little daughter: what if "
The cycling professional admitted that there are quite aspects with which he increasingly difficult.
"But it was good to remember on the Corona time what I have about cycling and how much he is."
The time trial specialist enters back in at the Tour de l'Ain (5 to 9 August).
Bavaria: At least four dead aths on Bavaria's streets on the weekend
The beautiful weather attracts bikers bikers on the streets.
For at least three people, the tour ends fatally.
Also an 18-year-old old pedestrian.
Schönthal - In case accidents on Bavaria's streets, several, mostly young people on the weekend.
An 18 year old motorcyclist was captured on Saturday at Schönthal (county of Cham) by a car that on the opposite lane.
Why the car was on the track was unclear.
In Upper Bavaria, a 22-year-old met on his machine with a horse carriage.
He was going downhill according to the police at Beilngries.
In a left curve, he boashed against the carriage.
His injuries were so heavy that he died at the accident.
Of the twelve inmates of the coach, a man was heavy and a man slightly injured, the police reported.
In another fatly accident, an 18-year-old died in Bad Kötzting.
He had put on a street on night to Sunday and was overrolled by a 42 year old driver.
According to the police the police, the 18-year-old wanted to sleep.
The driver could no longer brake in time.
At Schönberg (district Freyung-Grafenau) on Saturday, a 57 year-old old biker boashed against a right curve in a full brake despite frontfront against a car.
He died in the accident
The 57-year-old driver suffered a shock, the remaining three people in the car.
The safety of motorcyclists was on Saturday by Bavaria's Minister of Transport Kerstin Schreyer (CSU).
In a letter to the organizer of the biker protests against August driving bans, Gabor Kovacs, the Minister referred to extensive investments such as underride protection to guide barriers and the defuse of dangerous curves.
"We have achieved a lot for cyclists we have achieved a lot for safety in recent years," they said the writing.
"The number of motorized two-cyclists killed by around 28 percent compared to 2011.
Kovac tests with Monaco against Frankfurt
Frankfurt / Main (dpa) - For football coach Niko Kovac, there with his new club AS Monaco soon a union with Eintracht Frankfurt.
The eight-time French champion will be guest on 1 August (6 .00 pm) at the Hesse, the former club of the Croat.
For the Bundesliga it is the first and only hardness test before the Europa League against FC Basel (6 August).
Because of the Coronavirus pandemic, the encounter is held without spectators.
"We are looking forward to this game.
It is always nice to come to Frankfurt and meet friends, "said Kovac
Sporty this is an interesting test, said the 48-year-old.
Before he to FC Bayern Munich, Kovac had trained Hesse from 2016 to 2018 and led victory in the DFB Cup.
"A top-class opponent like Monaco is a good test for us in terms of the game against Basel.
Like all Frankfurt, I look forward to seeing meeting with Niko Kovac, "said Eintracht coach Adi Hütter.
The 50 year old Austrian had succeeded the Croat the Eincht.
In March, the Frankfurt lost the eighth-final to Basel in their own stadium 0 – 3.
Almost 50 new infections: Landkreis Hof just past the Lockdown
In the district of Hof, the number of known Corona new infections increased on the weekend: from 39 on Friday and 43 on Saturday (one person is recovered and no longer in this statistics) to 47 on Sunday.
There is a case in the city Hof.
This, the Hof area approaches the critical brand of 50 new infections per 100,000 inhabitants in a week.
700 dead by monsoon rain in Southeast
The severe floods in Southeast Asia affect more than 9 million people, especially in Bangladesh, India and Nepal
Because of the strong monsoon rain, a total of 700 people died.
In Bangladesh, the Red Crescent is trying in boats to reach the isolated people.
Entire villages are under water
The farmers have lost their crops.
Tank rhinos in National park die by land
In the Kaziranga National Park, several of the 120 tank rhinos died by landslides.
They are under protection and valid as endangered of extinction.
This year, the floods are particularly bad, which scientists back to climate change.
According to the United Nations, Bangladesh is one of the most countries hit by global warming.
New apartments are empty
In the village Cox's Bazar in the south of Bangladesh, the state has built apartments for 650 displaced by the floods.
So far, only few have moved.
It is difficult to bring the people to Cox's Bazar.
Also the enthusiasm in Grenezn.
If you formerly had a house, it was so small and similar like a hut, often do not want to spend his life in a large residential block.
Many apartments are empty, but - so the government wants - soon be moved from those who have lost their house by the floods
60 Corona new infections in just one day in
In 24-hour comparison, 60 Corona new infections were reported in Vienna - 22 new infections in Lower Austria.
The LandessanitätsDirecfor Vienna and the medical crisis staff of the City of Vienna regularly inform about the current case figures and other figures for the Covid-19 9 virus: at Sunday, 26 July 2020, 8 00, are confirmed positive tests are 4,840 (+ 60) confirmed in Vienna.
The number of deaths associated to the virus is unchanged 204.
4,090 (+ 48) people are recovered.
22 new coronavirus infections in
The number of coronavirus infections in Lower Austria increased by 22 on Sunday to now 3,288.
A suffer is recovered according to the medical staff.
This increases the number of recovered to 2,936.
Currently, Covid-19 were 247 patients in the state.
So far, 147,253 tests have been carried out.
105 people died in connection with lung disease.
Argentina rejects counteroffer from creditors
The new demands could not be met, said the Ministry of Economic Affairs in Buenos Aires on Saturday.
"This would not only irresponsible, but also unjust," said a statement.
"While 50 percent of children in Argentina live in poverty, we can not increase the short-term profits of our creditors.
The debt of the second-largest economy in South America are no longer sustainable under current conditions.
That is why Argentina asks its private creditors to waiego part of its claims of around $66 billion (around EUR 59 billion).
If there is no agreement, the country is again ens the state debt.
It would be the ninth payment default in Argentine history.
Most recently, lenders had demanded higher interest on the government bonds and changes to some contract clauses.
However, the Argentine government is to its last offer and is not no further concessions.
Argentina is in a serious financial and economic crisis.
The inflation rate was more than 50 percent.
For the current year, experts expect a decline in economic power by around ten percent.
At the end of May, Argentina had not paid interest claims of $503 million and was slipped into a limited payment default.
Arrived professionprofessional - privately not yet
"It is super well" - this conclusion draws by Dr. Stefanie Kramer after her first days in the notary in Eggenfelden.
In the end, everything went very fast in mid-May, Dr. Stefanie Kramer learned that she will succeed Lutz Feller in the Eggenfelden Eggenfelden.
Already six weeks later, at the beginning July, the doctorate lawyer began the work, the normal daily business is long fully full.
"However, I still have to get private," she explains in conversation with the Rottaler Anzeiger and laughs.
The short lead time has of course was not enough to relocmove the focus point from Regensburg completely to Eggenfelden, the native Dingolin finger reports.
She is currently with her husband, who works as a judge at the district court, in looking for a suitable apartment or a house in the city.
At least, her husband had still apply for parental leave to ensure the care of the two daughters (3 ½ and 1 ½ years old.
In not to have to commevery day from Regensburg, she also have a overnight stay with her parents in Dingolfing, the 39-year-old.
Growing up in the neighboring district, the city of Eggenfelden has been a known for a long time.
When visits on site with her family in the past months, she has found: "Eggenfelden is a really beautiful small town".
She was all more pleased that she had made the race in the selection process.
In Dr. Stefanie Kramer er's professional career, her home of Lower Bavaria plays a central role: After studying the law in Passau, she completed her referendary period and the 2nd State examination in Regensburg.
After several positions as a notary assess, including in Rehau and Hof in Upper Franconia, Babenhausen im Unterallgäu and Regensburg - during this time she also owed "the" doctorate in labour law - she took her first position as a notary in Rotthalmünster in the district of Passau.
In 2016 she went on parental leave, and followed by the move to Regensburg.
Since then, she has over representative services in various notary offices.
When the job in Eggenfelden was advertised because of the approretirement of Lutz Feller, she had seen the right time come for the full professional re-entry, the 39-year-old explains.
The team of its predecessor, who will take over the holiday representation in the notary office, has over Dr. Stefanie Kramer - and has a praise for the team of the law firm: "It is going super well!"
That she can rely on established processes here makes it easier for her to care of the upcoming shift of the private focus.
In terms of kindergarten or nativity places, she has already made contact with a local institution.
And if everything works as desired, she hopes to be able to pursue her hobby here soon - and get to know the most beautiful jogging of the RottValley.
BVB plans to start the league start with a maximum of 15,000 spectators
Dortmund The largest German football stadium in Dortmund will not be filled to 20 percent at the start of season in the case of a fan return.
"Due to the distance regulation that is to be observed, we are planning to current level with 12,000 to 15,000 viewers," said Borussia Dortmund's CEO Carsten Cramer to the "Tagesspiegel.
Usually the arena in the Revierstadt is holds more than 81,000 tators in Bundesliga games.
In the ghost games caused the Corona pandemic last season, the BVB had lost around four million euros per game.
The Cramer responsible the BVfor marketing, digitization and internationalization hopes that in addition to the normal spectators, also some of the around 4,4000 seats in the hospitality can opened: "It is of course a blow into the office if these revenues completely break away completely".
In view of the ongoing Corona crisis, everyone are "well advised to take a stable side lengge".
"If many companies are't work well and 6.8 million people are in short work in Germany alone, then the need is limited to entertainment," said Cramer.
The Dortmund marketing chief praised the BVB professionals for their salary waiunciation, which to help to overcoming the crisis: "Of course, players know that their salary waihas a different effect than if we put 100 people who 100 people working in merchandising".
Tiny wondercles: early start into life with a few hundred grams
Hardly hevier than a Packerl butter, just three tablespoons of blood throughout his body: that was Gabriel when he was born - he weighed exactly 273 grams.
The boy is one of about 400 early mature eies, are ed annually at the Graz Children's Hospital Clinic.
A quarter of them weighs less than 1,500 grams, a few - such as Gabriel and his brothers Raphael and Michael - are extreme light weights with not even a kilogram of birth weight.
They are so small and born so early that neither lungs nor intestine, nor muscles are fully.
Your skin is sometimes so delicate that they could injured the electrodes of an ECG
And they are so tiny that they sometimes wear doll's clothing and specially made mini diapers made for them.
But not so small that they were not be the voice - "and like", Berndt Urlesberger smiles.
"Even if they don't scream as loud as big babies"
When the whiteboard becomes
Despite Corona Theater in the classroom: the whiteboard as a stage experienced just before the holiday of the 9th classes of the St. James High Gymnasium in Abtsgmünd.
Actress Julia Sylvester from Theater der Stadt Aalen presented the students the production "Das Heimatkleid" - by video.
After wards, the students could exchange via Skype with the actress and director Winfried Tobias Skype about the play and the performance.
The idea was born for the performance format from the current Corona situation.
Teacher Teresa Nar was pleased about the enrichment the teaching.
Even if at the end all participants were agreed that the direct encounter in the theatre and stage room would offer additional stimuli, you can also in the theatre see the potential for contact into the schools.
"If we further improve the technical framework, this could be an interesting addition to the game operation," stressed director Winfried Tobias.
First round: The TSV 1860 would meet Eintracht Frankfurt in the DFB Cup
If the TSV 1860 qualify for the DFB Cup, the lions meet Eintracht Frankfurt in the first round.
This resulted in the draw on Sunday.
Munich - Sixty possible opponent in the first round of the DFB Cup is.
The lions would meet Eintracht Frankfurt a successful qualification.
This resulted in the draw on Sunday evening in the ARD sports show.
Because because of the Corona pandemic, the participating field is not yet complete, placeholders were used were used in the draw.
Due the voluntary waiunciation of semsemi-final opponent FC Memmingen, the TSV 1860 is already in the final of the Bavarian Toto Cup (4 or 5 September).
There the lions meet either the Würzburger Kickers or Viktoria Aschaffenburg.
If Zweitleague Aufsteiger Würzburg reach the final, sixty would already be qualified for the first round in the DFB Cup.
Otherwise, the Giesinger would have to win in the final against regional alliist Aschaffenburg.
The first round of the DFB Cup will be held between 11 and 14 September and thus a week before the third league start.
"Blown from the Wind": legend Olivia de Havilland is
The film legend and Oscar winner Olivia de Havilland is dead.
She had died on Sunday in Paris at the age of a natural death, her spokesperson of the German Press Agency.
de Havilland was well known for her role as Melanie Hamilton in the southern epic "Vom Winde verweht" (1939).
Born as a child of British parents in Tokyo, Olivia de Havilland still moved to California to California as a infant.
The Austrian theatre man Max Reinhardt discovered the 19-year-old in the role of the Hermia of Shakespeare's "Midsummer's Dream.
The film studio Warner Brothers signed her immediately for seven years and brought her out at the side of Eroll Flynn.
She made eight films with the heart break.
In 1946, she won her first Oscar in the lead role of "To Each His Own".
The film ran in Germany under the title "Mutterherz".
Three years later, the award became the best actress in William Wyler's "The Heiress".
She was also much apprecirecognition as a neurotic eccentriric in "The Dark Spiegel" and "The Snake gruit".
Daphne du Maurier proposed her in 1952 the lead role in the filadaptation of her novel "My Cousin Rachel".
The piece became a worldwide success.
With her long-time friend Bette Davis, she played in "Wiegenlied für a body".
The marriage to the writer Marcus Goodrich (1946 to 1953), the son of Benjamin.
In Paris, de Havilland married journalist Pierre Paul Galante and had the daughter Gisèle with him.
This marriage also broke.
Rumors of an affair with the former British Prime Minister Edward Heath were never confirmed.
"Road to Timmendorf": Beach volleyball: Thole / Wickler miss the final at Comeback
The World Cup II Julius Thole and Clemens Wickler have missed the final at the beach volleyball tournament "Road to Timmendorf".
At the meeting the top teams in Düsseldorf, they lost in semsemi-finals their national team colleagues Nils Ehlers and Lars Flüggen with 1: 2 (17: 21, 21: 17, 19: 21).
Finally, Thole / Wickler had played in last year at the World Tour Final in Rome.
In the final on the Rhine, their conors of Ehlers / Flüggen against the surprise team Lukas Pfretschner and his interim partner Steven van de Velde lost 0: 2 (17: 21, 17: 21).
In addition to the show tournament, three starting places for the German Championships were in the beginning of September in Timmendorfer Strand: tickets secured Armin Dollinger / Simon Kulzer, Manuel Harms / Richard Peemüller and Richard emüller and Simon Pfretschner / Milan Sievers.
Calveitzejection from AfD confirmed - FDP speaks of "fig leaf"
The exclusion of Andreas Kalbitz from the AfD is from the perspective of the FDP is only a "fig leaf" and does not change the character of the party.
"The AfD is the parliamentary arm of the right-wing right in Germany.
Andreas Kalbitz is only part of the top of the iceberg of Raals in the AfD, "said FDP interior politician Benjamin Strasser of the news agency dpa in Berlin.
The Federal Arbration Court of the AfD confirmed on Saturday in Stuttgart after several hours, confirmed the exclusion of Kalbitz, which the Federal Board had decided in May.
Kalbitz is chairman of the AfD Group in the Brandenburg Landtag.
"If the AfD were really about consistently removing right-wing extremists from their party, functionofficials such as Björn Höcke and his followers would have long been expexcluded," said Strasser.
"However, there is no political will in the AfD, because right-wing extremism now to the party"
Similarly, CSU General Markus Blume said: "That that Andreas Kalbitz is now excluded, says nothing and does not change anything," he said to the "world on Sunday".
"It is rather volumes of how many frenetic supporters still have a right-wing right in the middle in the middle of the AfD".
Blume assects that the AfD will land back below five percent in the elections.
"The days of the AfD in the parliaments are counted".
Kalbitz was one of the spokesof the officially dissolved "wing" around the Thuringian AfD state and group chairman Björn Höcke; the protection of the Constitution classithe Stronation as a "secured right--extremist effort".
In May, the AfD federal had thrown Kalbitz from the party.
As a reason he said that Kalbitz had not stated his party entry an earlier membership in the now forright--right "Heimatloyuen Deutsche Jugend Youth" (HDJ) and with the Republicans.
Kalbitz denies membership of the HDJ.
The chairman of the left faction frafaction in the Brandenburg Landtag, Sebastian Walter, also stressed that the decision of the Federal Arbitration Court did not change to the character of the AfD: "The wolf has eaten only chalk.
The AfD remains a far-right party, whether with or without calbitz ".
Neither decision weakens the federal party nor the right wing.
"The maneuver of the Meuthen troops is clearly able.
You want to avoid further observation by the protection of the Constitution and try to get through under the radar, "said Walter.
"The AfD will not get rid of the spirits that she called.
A ejection is not change anything, "said the Brandenburg SPD General Erik Stohn, commented the decision in the Kalbitz case.
"Here, the AfD state Association and the group still held its right-wing leader".
The legal dispute over the membership of Kalbitz in the AfD will continue
He announced on Saturday that he would now civil law against the decision of the Federal Arbration Court.
North Sea wind farms supply a good 21 percent more electricity
The wind power plants on the German North Sea have fed 11.51 terawatt hours of electricity in the first six months of year.
This is a good 21 percent more than in the same period of the previous year, the network operator Tennet Tennet in Bayreuth.
Tennet is responsible for the transmission of the North Sea electricity to the mainland and forwarding through the German electricity grid.
The wind bines on the Baltic Sea, which not part of Tennet grid area have fed another 2.22 terawatt hours (TWh) electricity.
In total, the wind power from the North and Baltic Sea comes to 13.73 TWh, compared to a good 11.64 TWh in the first half of 2019.
The wind harvest at sea is accounts for almost 19 percent of the total wind power in Germany; and this is about four percentage points more than a year ago.
New wind farms ensure higher generation
The increased contribution of offshore wind energy is in addition to the wind conditions from higher generation capacities, because new wind farms have the grid in the past twelve months.
If the 1270 wind power plants in the North Sea were run with full at full time, they could calculcould generate 6.7 gigawatts of electricity.
The transmission capacity is sufficient; it according to Tennet is 7.1 gigawatts.
By 2030, it rise to 17 gigawatts in the German North Sea.
"In Germany and the Netherlands, we are investing 20 billion 20 billion in the expansion of offshore network connections," said Tennet Managing Director Tim Meyerjürgens.
In reality, wind farms can not exploit their capacity at sea, but reach about 40 percent.
The previous record day this year is January 2 January, when the North Sea wind farms generated more than six gigawatts of electricity.
On average, the North Sea wind turbines produce about 2.5 to 3.0 gigawatts of electricity, representing three to four nuclear power plants.
This could allow almost seven million households to be electricity.
Art "Skirmish" - an exhibition by the Leipzig artist Christian Bold in the Galerie des Gmünder Kunstverein
This was almost a small anniversary celebration for the 130.
Birthday of the Gmünder Kunstverein: The exhibition opening "Skirmish" with the works by Leipzig artist Christian Bold broke the usual frame after the Corona break.
Much more art friends than usual pursued the dialogue between the artist and the chairman of the KunstAssociation, Professor Dr. Klaus Ripper.
The musical equivalent was by the band "Defenders of the Universe" on the southern the southern Kornhausplatz.
North of the gallery, the association "Sandtogether" was involved.
Freital: Windbergfest cancelled Corona
The Windbergfest does not take place this year.
The city of Freital cancelled the three-day festival in September.
In other years, over 30,000 people had visited this city festival.
"We really did not made this decision easy and - in aware of how difficult it is economic for the participants - hoped to the last minute," Lord Mayor Uwe Rumberg (without partial).
"But in the end, we as organizer we are responsible for the health of many thousands of people".
Because if tens of thousands had flowed to the fixed area and the marqutent, minimum distances, hygiene regulations and a contact tracking could not have been met in accordance with the current Coronash Protection Regulation.
Or the restrictions would have been so strong that not much would have been left.
In addition, organizational and monitoring effort would increase disproportionately.
Rumberg spent next year.
Then the city of Freital will celebrating its 100th anniversary, with the Winterberg Festival from 7 to 9 May 2021 and the Day of Saxons from 10 to 12 September 2021.
Dressage Olympic champion Werth in Achleiten not to
Achleiten - The 6-time Olympic champion Isabell Werth was the outstanding rider at the dressage tournament in the Austrian Achleiten.
The 51-year-old from Rheinberg came four victories on four weekend at four starts.
After she won a Grand Prix at the opening with Weihegold and Quantaz, she was also to be in the Grand Prix in the Grand Prix Special and the freestyle.
On the 15-year-old mare Weihegold, Werth won clearly in the special against the Austrian Victoria Max-Theurer on Abegglen.
Also in the freestyle the Germans on Saturday on Quantaz clearly before their 34 years year-old old student Victoria Max-Theurer.
Werth's winning horse Quantaz belongs to Max-Theurer.
The most successful dressage rider in the world is to establish the ten-year-old stallion in the Grand Prix.
For Quantaz, it was the first freestyle at all.
Already at the first tournament in Achleiten three weeks ago, Werth had won all important four exams.
The last of the three international tournaments is planned there for 14 to 16 August.
Future more air traffic controllers in Worms
The Wormser University continues on into the air: the "DFS Deutsche Flugsicherung" donates a professorship for "Air Traffic Management".
A corresponding contract between the university and the DFS has now been signed in Worms.
The contract was initially concluded for three years and starts in 2021.
With the professorship, it is possible to enable the study start not only in the summer, but also for the winter semester.
This allows double twice as many students can be trained as before.
At the same time, the capacities are equally used at the university and at the air navigation Academy of the DFS.
The DFS will advise the university on the establishment and appointment of the professorship.
Represented at the university since 2019
Since the summer semester of 2019, the first students have part of their training as air traffic controller at the Worms Applied have been in the course in Air Traffic Management.
This year, nine students already started.
So far, the experiences of DFS are very positive, the achievements of the students are excellent.
The combination of study and pilot training contributes significantly to further increase the attractiveness of the pilot profession.
"In these times, funding is not easy for us economically.
However, we are firmly expect that air traffic to recover and continues to grow again in the long term.
In order to fulfil our legal mission in the future, we need highly qualified staff, "says Professor Klaus-Dieter Scheurle, Chairman Managing Director of the DFS when signing the contract.
"For the DFS, the foundation owed professorship is a future-looking investment, which will provide air controllers with a broad, cross-interdisciplinary knowledge base in the long term.
We therefore continue the good cooperation with the university and at the same time strengthen our attractiveness as an employer ".
This is underby Professor Dr. Jens Hermsdorf, President of the University of Worms: "The foundation owed professorship is an important bridge between science and business.
With it we would like to build on the existing cooperation with DFS Deutsche Flugsicherung as a practical partner for the dual bachelor degree in Air Traffic Management ".
The trust of German Flugsicherung is motivation and commitment for the Worms University and commitment to expand its teaching and research competence in the future areas of air transport.
In use for the flight controllers of tomorrow, the university with the first foundation professorship for a dual program could set special highlights and innovative priorities for its students.
Dr. Denis Alt, State Secretary at the Ministry of Science, Education and Culture, undersizes: "The University of Worms, with its focus in the air transport has a unique selling feature in Rhineland-Palatinate.
Today's signing of the cooperation agreement strengthens the profile of the university's university ".
Rescue helwdriver lands on the A 45
About 30 minutes, the A 45 motorway was closed on Saturday morning towards Aschaffenburg, because after a traffic accident icopter the helicopter was in operation.
A 76-year-old drove straight with a Ford around 12.40 pm at the exit Alzenau-Mitte in the curve and landed at the main planank.
The impact, the frontfront irbags, the driver suffered slight injuries on the face and had to be taken to hospital for treatment.
The injuries of the 72-year-old passenger were provided by the emergency doctor and the patient flown to hospital with the rescue helicopter.
However, the police are assume that there is no life danger.
The damaged vehicle, with a damage of about 2000 euros, to be removed.
Heil wants to other industries by meat industry
The Corona crisis once again lighted the conditions states in parts of the meat industry.
Legisllaw tightening are about.
But are they right - and will it remain?
Federal Minister of Labour Hubertus Heil (SPD) wants to review according the planned strict regulations against maluses in the maluses in the meat industry.
"We will look the industry for the industry and then take appropriate measures for the respective industry if it is necessary," said Heil of the German Press Agency in Berlin.
Germany's employers are already warn against restriciting work contracts in general.
After the mass Corona erupbreak at the meat giant Tönnies in North Rhine-Westphalia, the Federal Cabwants to adopt a law of salvation this Wednesday.
Major slaughlaughter should no longer allowed to use foreign personnel in slaughter, decomposition and meat processing.
For this purpose, the use of work contract and temporary workers there to be prohibited there.
Employer President Ingo Kramer said the dpa: "Finger away from a general restriction of factory contracts and employee leave if you do not want to strangle the economy".
Works contracts, for example, mandatory for wide areas of the crafts, the construction industry and plant construction are the basis for their value at the customer.
"The failures of individual individuals cannot destroy such an important instrument".
Heil assured: "My goal is not to forhibit work contracts everywhere in the German economy".
Work contracts are useful.
"If an industrial company instructs a craftsman to install a safety system, this is a normal work contract.
The German meat industry considers a prohibition on plant contracts and temporary work alone is unconstitutional in its industry.
It was not explicable why portioning and packaging of cheese, other labour law other labour law than with sausage, it says a statement on the legislative project, as the "Neue Osnabrücker Zeitung (Saturday) reports.
If a proban, the consumer price would increase by 10 to 20 percent per kilo and product.
Many ften Eastern European employees from factory contract companies worked in the industry according to the results of the NRW Health Safety administration 16 hours a day.
They often had no break
Wages was been retained for protective equipment or rent.
It was also noted that the situation in accommodation was often miserable.
Heil said that a relatively sharp law entered into force for the meat industry in 2017.
However, "tricky constructions" these were avoided.
"Now needs to be fundamentally cleaned up".
The politician announced: "In the Occupational and Safety Act, we want to in the cabinet at end of July, are also measures that not only affect the meat industry - for example, higher test rates in terms occupand safety or clear criteria for Community shelters".
The draft presented the dpa includes amendments to the law on the protection of workers' rights in the meat industry and the Occupand Safety Act.
Brandenburg's Minister for Consumer Ursula Nonnemacher (Green) believes that more intensive controls are necessary.
"I would hope that we to make even more controls in many supervisory areas: food controls, animal welfare, everything possible, for as animal transport," said Nonnemacher on Sunday in the RB show "Brandenburg aktuell".
But more controls also need more personnel.
Three dead in crash of ultralight aircraft in Germany
When the crash of an ultra-light aircraft on a multi-family house in Wesel in the German state of North Rhine-Westphalia, three people died.
A child was slightly injured
Two other people had been saved in the accident, said a spokesman of the district control point Wesel.
At the parachute a parachute had been found, according to the police.
The "Rheinische Post" reported, iting to eyewitnesses that before the crash the plane was crded with a hot air balloon.
The house is a single or two-family house.
Further details were not known.
Clearacution of Frankfurt Opernplatz peacefully
A week after the riots in Frankfurt, the evacuof the opera Square was also peacefully during the night on Sunday.
Finally, a few dozen people stayed in the square, but left at 1 a.before the curfew.
The police have been in operation with numerous officers since early evening, a larger police service was seen throughout the area.
For the first time this weekend from midnight, a ban of ban for the Opera Square, where which riots occurred a week ago.
Policemen had attacked from the crowd of celebrations with bottles.
At least five officers were injured after police entries, and several police vehicles were damaged.
The night for Saturday was also quiet.
Car overats: Young woman seriously injured in accident on Bundesstraße 83 at Hofgeismar
In an accident between Schöneberg and Hümme, a 21-year-old has suffered serious injuries on Sunday at 1.25 pm.
She was taken to the Klinikum Kassel.
With thermal imaging cameras, the fire department sought possible passengers.
According to the police, the woman was on Bundesstraße 83 towards her residential town of Hümme, when her car came from the road from unexplained cause and over several times.
To save the accident, the fire department had to cut the roof.
Since it was unclear whether someone was still in the vehicle, the adjacent corn field was ed from the rotary conductor with a thermal imaging camera.
The drone enstsquaffel from Warburg, which also works with thermal imaging cameras, had also ordered for the personal search.
However, the troops found one between the high corn plants
The seriously injured was taken with the ambulance to the Kassel hospital.
Almost 50 volunteforces of the fire department Hofgeismar, Hümme and Schöneberg were there.
The federal road was closed for two hours because of the accident.
Juventus Turin champion in Italy in Italy
Turin - After a redempgoal of Cristiano Ronaldo, record champion Juventus Turin has won the Italian championship for the ninth time in series.
The team for the five-time world footballer made the total of 36th Scudetto in the history with a 2 0 (1 – 0) on Sunday evening against Sampdoria Genoa.
Ronaldo scored the 1 – 0 before the half.
With 83 points, Turin, which without the last long-injured former national player Sami Khedira, is two days before the Serie A.
The Inter Inter Milan is seven points.
Juventus was harmless despite the optical superiority in the first half, then Ronaldo hit after a free bick variant with the last action.
A game by Miralem Pjanic was ited the 35-year-old from the penalty area border directly with a flat shot (45 th + 7).
Against the more offensive guests, Ronaldo was involved in the 2 – 0, after his shot, Federico BernardFederi Bernardeschi (67 7th).
This, the glosless, but decisive success was secured.
The foulf meter shot to the latte in the 89th minute should only have only Ronaldo himself with view of the Torjunter rating.
"It's complicated to stay mentally and physically at ball level for 90 minutes.
The games are strange, and the momentum changes very slightly, "said coach Maurizio Sarri after the 1-2 at Udinese Calcio on Thursday.
Especially the mental exhaustion of his players great, said the Jucoach.
Because of the defeat, the Turinhad not able to make the championship perfect.
The end of the calming lead at the table, Juve due to the weakness of competitors.
Because in the eleven games before the game on Sunday, the Sarriteam had only five victories.
Whether Ronaldo is becomes a scorer king is questionable.
Because while the Portuguese superstar has 31 goals so far, the former Dortmund under Ciro Immobile has already 34 hits in his in the 5: 1 (1: 1) of the fourth Lazio Rome in the Hellas Verona in at the Hellas Verona - as many, as Robert Lewandowski contributed to the title win of FC Bayern.
The record in Italy is the current Juprofessional Gonzalo Higuaín
The Argentine scored 36 goals for the 2015 2016 season for the SSC Naples.
In August, the "Old Lady" of Italian football the next title chance.
Juventus is in the eighfinal of the Champions League, must play a 0 – 1 side against Olympique Lyon against Olympique Lyon to reach the final tournament in Lisbon.
In the next knoo.round, Real Madrid or Manchester City would wait as an opponent.
Baden-Württemberg: More than 250 illegal car races
Stuttgart - Despite all threatened penalties and court dgments, drivers continue to gas in countless illegal races on the streets of Baden-Württemberg: year last year and the first four months of this year, the police in the southwest than registered 250 illegal races in the southwest.
There are no comparcomparison values for the before, but the rapers are increasingly work the judicial authorities: In the public prosecutatoroffices between Konstanz and Mannheim, a total of 155 investigation tigation were conducted for illegal races, a year later it was already 252 and in current year already 151 until the beginning of June.
The races were less about organized events, as from the response of the Ministry of Interior to a request by the Landtags-SPD.
In most cases, the drivers were spontaneously against each other or they had taken the escape from the police - this is also indicated as an illegal race.
The wheel was by German men between the ages between 18 and 60.
113 fines - 15 times detention
Only in comparatively few cases, the raers are caught and also asked to the checkout: According to the Ministry of Interior, a total of 113 fines have been imposed since 2018 and 15 sentences ment imprisonprison.
However, there is no evidence that the number of illegal car races is actually increasing.
Rather, other drivers responacted more sensitive to the several tragic accidents and processes of past years than before and indicated more frequently, a spokesman.
The motorway 8 is particularly popular with raeds. Driand ists are slow the traffic there to make and use the free distance for a race.
Last August, a dozen drivers were caught near Kirchheim unter Teck, three months before, there were 18 drivers on the A8 at Merklingen.
A81 is the most popular "
On the A81, the police register even more races than on any other federal highway.
With a speed limit it is tried to slow down the raers on the particularly affected section between affected section between Engen and Geisingen.
The mostly high-priced and smoed sports and luxury carosoften have Swiss plates, because the drivers to Germany of the high penalties for fast driving and car racing in the neighbouring country to the lawn.
For the SPD, the speed limit must not reduced to a few distances: "With a general speed limit of 130 kilometers per hour, we would create this problem on motorways off," says Martin Rivoir, the transport expert of the SPD state tag faction.
"The inhold for Raser would be significantly higher if you should not be here and there with 200 kilometers of hour and more."
Rivoir keeps less of enlighor image campaigns: "Those who overover all rules in all the rules and not only risk their own life, but also the life of other road users, is hardly be able with reason".
ADAC calls for stronger police of police
The ADAC is not enough for the ADAC: "We assume that Raser will not be deterared by the speed limits," says Holger Bach, Head of Transport and the Environment at the ADAC Württemberg.
It calls for additional and toughder controls on the routes affected.
Not inoften, painful and following ousness becomes painful tourof severousness: Since January 2019 and to April 2020, three people died in the races, of two uninvolved in a nocturntly crash in Stuttgart's city centre and one in Gerlingen.
Two young men two young men to delivered a car race in November.
One of the vehicles came from the road, bounced against a garden wall and remained lying on the side, the 18-year-old passenger died.
21 more people were injured in the races of the past two years
However, sharer penalties are not necessary according to the Interior Minister Thomas Strobl: "Legislative need for action in order to sanction illegal motor vehicle races harder is not seen," says the paper of the Ministry of the Interior.
Blaulight of July 23: Thirsty burgllarar steals from sn
Rohrdorf: A man broke into a snack on Thursday Rohrdorf in Rohrdorf (Calw) and has stolen drinks and cash.
A witness heard sounds at 3.40 clock in the valley street and ran towards the snack.
There he noticed a man who served with drinks on the fridge and left the snack by a entrance door.
The perpetrator fled towards the meadows behind the sn
The burglar also used to the police at a checkout and steole cash in low three-digit area.
The suspect is described as follows: it is about 1.75 to 1.80 meters tall and strong.
In fact he wore a black hoodie, black pants and bright shoes.
The police receive further evidence.
Ackermann sprints to the final stage at Sibiu Tour
Cycling professional Pascal Ackermann has won his second day victory on the final stage of the 10th Sibiu Tour.
The 26 year old Palatinate from the team Borhansgrohe won on the 109 kilometometer long section with start and finish in Sibistadt in the mass sprint, after he already won a stage on Saturday.
It was the season victories three and four for Ackermann.
In the overall, his Austrian team mate GregMühlberger.
The 26-year-old had decided the mountain time trial for the in the morning and took the top in the class.
Only 104 drivers had to the final stage in the evening.
No less than 18 starters had fallen victim to the time limit in the mountain time trial.
"I'm really happy to start the season restart with a victory," Ackermann had explained after his success.
"The sprint was really hectic," said the 26-year-old.
300 meters before the finish, he simply attracted his sprint, "and it also worked perfectly".
According to the rules of the World Association UCI, a Corona test was performed by all racing participants and their companions six days before the race.
During the complete tour, drivers and supertainers were separated in isolated bbles were separated the organizational team, as well as from the media.
Vietators at start and finish were not allowed.
Control centre gave instructions for lay reanimation
Düsseldorf - Tragic accident on Sunday afternoon in Düsseldorf-Garath.
In a apartment house, a child (4) was suddenly lifeless in the water.
According to the fire department, the emergency call at shortly before 1 pm.
"A control center disponent immediately instructions for the lay reanimation," said a fire refighman to BILD.
The arriving rescue forces took over the revival measures shortly later.
The child floating in life was transported to the university clinic under resusitation.
Why it crashed is unclear.
The police routinely received the investigations into the accident.
The fire speaker: "We start from a tragic tragic accident in the apartment".
Nuremberg: Unapproved tuning meeting - Police intervene, 700 vehicles and around 1100 people
Hundreds of cars and temporarily over 1000 people participated on Saturday night in a "tuning meeting" in the parking lot of a furniture store.
The police made their announcement to control such events.
A big tuning meeting took place on Saturday evening (25 July 2020) in Nuremberg South stadt.
Several hundred vehicles were involved.
According to the police Central Franconia, around 22.30 p.m. the Nuremberg Transport Police had an increased of volume in the area of a large parking lot on Ingolstädter Straße.
The police the police took a variety of vehicle controls there.
Only recently, the police announced that they to more action against so-called autoposers.
Illegal tuning meeting in Nuremberg: Only small part from the "scene"
The officials counted a top good over 700 vehicles and about 1100 people, reports the police.
However, this, only a small part of the present should be assigned to the "autoposer" and tuning scene.
Apparently, most of the relevant scene followed the police appeal.
Based on the local vehicles and people, it be assumed that these were mainly mostly lookful.
In addition, the vast proportion of the adhered to the applicable infection protection regulations, in particular the compliance of the minimum distance and wearing a moumouth nasal protection.
The control measures carried site were ended around 1: 00.
In total, the officials found such changes in 10 vehicles that the operating permit had expired.
Four of these vehicles had to be ensured.
No
Illegal car races were not exist.
"The police headquarters of Central Franconia will continue to keep the events and continues to perform increased control measures, including in connection to the emerof lookers," it said.
The agency News5 spoke to Jürgen Schrödinger from the involved towing company: "They have all beautiful rims, we must not scratch," says Schrödinger.
Special bands would be used.
Also because the cars are wider ader, the company must be careful not to do damage.
"The young people should finally get back their cars without prejudice".
Employment Agency figures: 900 Suspicion cases of abuse in short-term work
Berlin - The Federal Agency for Labour (BA) is according to around 900 suspected cases of abuse in short-working money.
"This is extremely little for more than 880,000 companies that have reported short work," said the Board of the operational business, Daniel Terzenbach of the "Frankfurter Allgemeine Zeitung".
When at the beginning of the Corona crisis, very many companies had applied for short work, the BA had to react quickly.
Usually the exam takes up to three weeks.
"So much time was not available to us in this hot phase.
The more we will look at the final accounts.
There will certainly be a lot.
We are not naive and have a long breath
Indications of abuse would often come from the affected employees or trade unions.
In addition, use the BA analysis software to detect abuse patterns.
According to Terzenbach, the BA is preparing for a possible insolvency wave in autumn.
"Will there be significantly more insolvencies than in the previous year?
The assessments differ, but we prepare ourselves in the case of the case and already train our employees in the employment agencies to processing applications for insolvency money ".
The figures are still inconspicuous, said Terzenbach.
World Heritage in Potsdam: Party in the Neue
Potsdam - On Friday evening about 40 young people celebrated a party in the Neue
The collection had been dissolved at 8.48 pm by the drivers of the Stiftung Preußische Schlösser und Gärten Gardens (SPSG), the foundation was announced on PNN request.
The young people had left the park.
On Saturday evening, some young people would played rugby in the New Garden.
The meadow had been cleared by district drivers, said SPSG spokesman Frank Kallensee on Sunday.
Again and again illegal celebrations in the parks
In the parks of the Foundation, there are always accum, in which the distance and hygiene regulations Covid-19-19 ProcOrdordinance are not observed.
At the end of June, was a celebration with about 300 people in Park Babelsberg Park, a week later about 150 people in the Neue Garten.
Even without Coronaverregulations, the parks are closed when the dark.
The storage on the meadows is prohibited according to the park regulations, there are few exceptions.
The foundation has been complaining for long time that visitors would leave more and more garbage and destroy protected biotopes.
In Berlin, illegal park parties have reached another dimension.
In the Hasenheide in the Neukölln district, 5,000 people at Sunday 5,000 people celebrated an illegal techno party.
The event was dissolved by the police.
Austria: Mass tests after Corona eruption in tourist
With hundreds of tests, authorities have ded to a Corona outbreak in the popular Upper Austrian tourist of St. Wolfgang.
The number of confirmed cases increased to 48, as the state authorities in Linz.
More than 100 results were in the evening.
According, many of the infected are young interns in tourism companies, but at least one holiday guest has been positively.
Residents, guests and tourism staff were asked to stay in their accommodation on Saturday evening.
The curfew was set at 23
"There are there and there cancals and cancellations" of bookings, the head of the tourist Board Wolfgangsee, Hans Wieser, the dpa.
Some guests also left prematurely.
St. Wolfgang is the most important tourist resort in Upper Austria, with more than 400,000 nights last year.
In a normal season, around a third of the guests are Germans.
On Friday, the first infections had become publicly public.
The head of the district authority, Alois Lanz, defended the behavior of the interns, who had celebrated in several restaurants and could have been infected there.
"We all liked to do that in our youth," he said the radio station Ö1.
However, two bars were closed on Friday to prevent further infections
The Tourist Board launched an information campaign to sensiawareness ze young employees aware of the dangers of Covid-19.
From Saturday, hundreds of employees, holidaymakers ers and locals.
In addition, all guests were contacted who were in St. Wolfgang from 15 July.
The outbreak awouses memories of the Austrian ski and party resort of Ischgl in Tyrol, which was in the initial phase of the pandemic was a centre of the Corona spread throughout Europe.
In total, more than 1500 people are infected with the virus in Austria.
The focus in the new infections are Vienna and Upper Austria.
Premier League: Man United and Chelsea qualified for Champions League
London (dpa) - The English football champion Manchester United returns to the Champions League after a year absence.
The Red Devils secured the third place on the last Premier League day by a – 0 (0 – 0) victory against Leicester City.
The Foxes must now content with the Europa League, because Chelsea still passed by and qualified as fourth for the royal class.
In the fight against the des, Aston Villa was to cheer.
Manchester United was led by a penalty ick by Bruno Fernandes (71st minute).
After a red card for Leicester City in the afterseason, Jesse Lingard (90. + 8) reached the final.
Chelsea, in the Bayern Champions League ter-finfinal, won thanks to Mason Mount (45 th + 1) and Olivier Giroud (45th + 4) with 2-– 0 (2 0) against the Wolverhampton Wanderers.
"This means a lot to me," said coach Frank Lampard, who is in his first season as a Chelsea coach is also in the final of the FA Cup against Arsenal.
Chelsea's victory against Wolverhampton, Tottenham Hotspur, who passed with a lean 1 – 1 (1 – 0) at Crystal Palace at the Wolves and starting as sixth in the Europa League.
Aston Villa decided the distance duel with Watford FC and Bournemouth, but had to tremfor class support at West Ham United.
The late leadership of Jack Grealish (84 4th) immediately ated to Andrej Jarmolenko (85).
The 1: 1 (0: 0) was because Watford lost 2: 3 (1: 3: Arsenal.
The club, who scored three coaches in the season, descends after five first league years.
Just like Bournemouth, who could not save by a 3 – 1 (2: 1) at Everton FC.
In the end, a point was missing.
Liverpool FC, who has been an English champion since the end of June, secured a club record a – 1 (1 – 1) win at Newcastle United.
99 meters are the highest value that the Reds have ever scored in a football season.
Coach Jürgen Klopp in English football by coach Jürgen Klopp and his team.
The best mark holds Manchester City with 100 points in the 2017 / 18 season.
After the Newcastle lead in the first minute, Virgil van Dijk (38th), Divock Origi (59 9th) and Sadio Mané (89 9th) played the Sunday for Liverpool.
"For this wonderful club it was an extraordinary season," said scalorer van Dijk after the game, "that should encourage us to defend the title.
It will be difficult ".
The the end, the Premier League bosses should be satisfied.
Due of the Coronavirus crisis, the football in England was interrupted from 13 March to 17 June.
In the meantime, even about a early tion or a release of the remaining games on neutral ground.
After, the season could be played without any special events - but as like in Germany without tators in the stadi.
Arrests and violence in demonstrations against Netany
The protests in Israel against head of Netanyahu are becoming more and more violent.
During the night, violent clashes in the night.
The Israeli police violcion the night to Sunday in Jerusalem against participants in a demonstration against the right-wing conservative government Benjamin Netanyahu.
Twelve people were arrested for participating in unrest, police spokesman Micky Rosenfeld.
The police used water launwers to dissolve the r.
According to media reports Saturday evening, about 6000 people on Saturday gathered near Netanyahu's.
They protested against unemployment, corruption and Netanyahu dealing with the Corona crisis
The protesters beat drums, blew in horns and called Netanyahu to ign
Participants of a counter-demonstration were arrested that supported Netanyahu, reported the news page "ynet".
People in many other places in Israel also demonstrated, in front of the private villa of the head of government in the coastal city of Caesarea and in a park in Tel Aviv.
A man was arrested according to police near Tel Aviv because he is suspected of sprayed from a from a pepper spray on demonstrators on the side.
Another man was arrested after a knife attack on a demonstrator in the south of the country.
The demonstrator was slightly injured.
In Jerusalem and Tel Aviv, there have been several demonstrations against Netanyahu.
The rallies accompany the corruption process against the head of
Finally, Netanyahu was also criticized for handling of the Corona crisis.
He is provided with rapid loosasing and a lack of preparation for a second Corona wave.
The Corona crisis has been difficult to the country ’ s economy.
The unemployment rate was more than 20 percent.
The number of new infections with the Coronavirus in Israel has recently increased to ever new record values.
Accident at Ahlen (NRW) - Transporter kracht auf car - nine injured - Ruhrgebiet - Bild.de
Ahlen - A drilision accident demanded nine light injured on Saturday afternoon on Saturday afternoon on the B58 near Ahlen.
A motordriver was with her two children (3, 5) towards Beckum.
The police: "Probumshe suddenly slowked down because she wanted to turn".
The driver of by the driver of a Mercedes transporter who behind her must have seen too late.
He crashed on the car on the back.
In the accident, three inmates in the car and six in the van.
Several ambulances took her to a hospital.
North Korea locks border city after Corona suspicion
North Korea has far seen in its own measures to the Coronavirus a "bright success".
Now the country first reports a suspion for the first time.
Because of the first official Corona susppicion in the country, North Korea has completely aled a large city out of fear of a disaster.
Despite the stricstrict epidemiological defense measures over the past six months, "the malicious virus could have been introduced into the country," the state media.
For the region around the border town of Kaesong, the emergency was imposed.
The communist leadership called the highest alarm level.
If the suspicion is confirmed, it would be the first official of infection with Sars-CoV-2 in the isolated country.
North Korea had not far had not registered a single infection and described its defense measures as a "luminous success".
The information was doubted abroad.
The symptoms of the disease reported portbeen reported in a "outlier" who illegally crossed the military demarcation line North Korea on 19 July.
The person had ed to South Korea three years ago and now returned across the border.
For the crossing within the four km wide and largely still mined military buffer zone, there was initially no confirmation from South Korea.
However, South Korea's military, according reports by the national news agency Yonhap, the possibility of an illegal border crossing to North Korea as high.
There was investigations into some people.
According to North Korea reported that on Saturday because of the suspicion called an urgent meeting of the Politburo of the Workers Party chaired by rulleader Kim Jong Un.
The "dangerous situation in Kaesong could trigger a deadly and destructive disaster".
Kim had ordered on Friday as a preventive measure to "completely block Kaesong and isolate every district and region from others," it continued.
The person as well as all people in Kaesong who had contact with her, had been quarantined.
The central military commission of the party is therefore to investigate the "outar fall" as well as the behavior of the responsible military unit and, if necessary, impose hard punishment.
According is estimated, about 300,000 people in Kaesong.
Excse before Council meeting: City-east and noise protection are still discussed before great summer break
"In addition to environmental issues, the committee will also vote among other vote on the development plan for the large-scale Innenstadtentwicklung-Ost," is more casually in the middle part of the urban press release to the next municipal council meeting on Tuesday, 28 July at 4.30 pm in the Great Hall of the Congress Centre Pforzheim.
However, the appreciation of the eastern city is however being discussed controversial until the end.
The majorities of this are short, most recently rejected in individual committees, depending on the presence.
An appeal from the economy (construction, real estate, trade and IT) the project developed from the citizenship and then by administration and the municipal council to fail after almost ten years of preparation, criproject opponent Reinhard Klein as "non-parliamentary opposition", "unsuspecting", "speculation", "denfamation" and "conscious false statements".
"All think that knowing it better," says Klein, who has been to the municipal council for a year the only representative of the citizens list the citizens list Pforzheim.
In fact, after reading the Treaties, in this position: "I know what I am talking about".
The exit of the city is cheaper, the Technical City Hall is, contrary to statements of the city administration for grants, whose existence Klein is convinced to renovate for 8.5 million euros.
The city will develop very differently than one forecast ted in the city hall and the part of supporters from the economy.
To shape the city by its own and not an investor: this is its his plan B. One day after Klein, the FDP / FW / UB / LED faction, which also jects the project, presented an alternative concept.
It also provides for the renovation of the Technical Town Hall, the open closure of Schloßberg, the rental of the ex-valley for administrative areas and a small-part inner city centre, ideally with local carriers.
Environmental topics play a central role.
In addition, environmental issues will also play a central role.
For example, the municipal council will vote, other vote on the noise action plan.
This includes various measures to protect the Pforzheim population from health noise pollution, caused by road traffic, including speed reductions.
In a press release, the local transport club Deutschland welcomes the widespread introduction of tempo 30. But the political leaders in the city are not innocent that this must to come because they contributed by neglect of line bus with thinncycles and little commitment to cycling contributed to the massive increase in car traffic, to the VCD.
The municipal council also es on the participation of the city of the energy and climate protection agency Pforzheim / Enzkreis.
In addition on the agenda is accession to the Climate Protection Pact of the state of Baden-Württemberg, the redefinition of the parental contributions in the urban child day care facilities and the application for inclusion in the smart city funding of the Federal Federation.
Citizens are welcome, but must take Corona measures
Tim Zimmermann starts Tim Zimmermann into the new season
With almost half a year of delay, Tim Zimmermann starts on July 31 July start in his premiere season in the ADAC GT Masters.
Before the league of supercars can start regular operation, the first test drives were started.
For carpmann, it was about getting to know his Lamborghini Huracan GT3.
The Corona crisis has for a long time ented Tim Zimmermann from start his first service trip in the new Lamborghini Huracan from Grasser Racing.
Under special hygiene conditions, this was now possible.
The 23-year-old Langenargener turned his first unds on the Lausitzring and was able to get used to his premiere in the GT3 car.
"There are already a few things that are different than the Porsche from the previous season," says Zimmermann.
"With the ABS, for example to have to go differently into the curves.
But it really been a lot of fun ".
Zimmermann also had fun with Steijn Schothorst, with he will share his orange sports car in the GT Masters.
The Dutch is despite his only 25 years has already experienced in GT sport and was able to help his new teammate in many things.
"I'm not a beginner in motorsport, but every new series also brings new challenges with new challenges," says Zimmermann.
"Steijn and I understand dazzling and we have made enormous progress from session to session at the Lausitzring.
Exis there - at the Lausitzring - the GT Masters will also hold its first race.
From July 31, the 33 sports cars will race through the Lusatia.
Zimmermann, who is one of 15 series newcomers, knows the route
In 2015, he was a last guest at the Motodrom.
"It worked quickly and I had to get used to the track," says Zimmermann, who starts for the Friedrichshshafen racing community Graf Zeppelin.
"The Lausitzring has many fast passages that you have to meet optimally to be fast".
How fast carpenter really is, that turns out in two weeks.
"The teams, of teams play a little bit in the tests," he says.
"But the, we are very satisfied and are looking forward to the first weekend at the Lausitzring".
The race in Brandenburg will be the start of a densely pressed calendar.
Seven races are until the beginning of November.
Current stand is that no viewers will be allowed - but there is a prominent guest
In mid-August at the Nürburgring, former Formula 1 driver Niko Hülkenberg will take the GT wheel.
British Minister of Transport of quarantine decision cold
The decision of the British government to quarantine Spandaymakers for two weeks for two weeks has to press reports caught the Minister of Minister of the country.
According to that Grant Shapps is currently on vacation in Spain in Spain, while his colleagues decided the measure decided the measure on Saturday.
Because of the Corona figures rising in Spain, the cabinet in London removed the country from the list of those countries from which allow entry without quarantine requirements.
The new rule is valid today, Sunday, so Shapps will have to quarantine after his return.
In Austria, the government has also imposed quarantine measures for returnees.
But the regulation applies to those who are only on the deaddate, only from Saturday, 1 August, and was not introduced overnight
By the way, Spain is still to considered as one of the "safe countries" for which there is no quarantine in Austria.
"Numerous ministers should have known in advance that there is possibility that a quarantine is imposed for holiday tourists Spain" said Labour MP Diane Abbot.
"But obviously, no one has made the trouble to tell Grant Shapps".
Almost a month after the end of the Corona emergency in Spain and the expiry of the strict cur, the of infections in the country are rising again.
Virorologists mainly blame the nightlife for the new spread.
Spain is one of the most holiday countries in the British.
The British necessary travel to the Spanish mainland, the British government advises, the Canary Islands and Balearic Canary Islands for British daymakers are exempexcluded.
So far, more than 272,000 infections have been registered with the novel Coronavirus and more than 28,000 dead in Spain.
Russia: Navy Day: Putin announces hypersound weapons for warships
Russian President Vladimir Putin has announced on the Day of the Navy in his country a equipment of the warships with most modern hyperic weapons.
With these unique weapons in the world would expand the fighting capabilities of the Russian naval forces, Putin said on Sunday in St. Petersburg at the central Navy parade.
The to the Defense of, according to the Interfax also about successful tests of the hypersonic rocket zircon built for the Navy.
The hypersound weapons have multiple the speed of sound of around 343 meters per second
They are considered as weapons of the future.
Underwater tropedeo continues
It was also built on the atomic underwater torpedo Poseidon.
The planned sea drone is planned to for the destruction of coastal destinations.
The president, who himself also ve with a military boat, said that this year alone, 40 new ships would be service in the individual fleet associations of the largest country in the world.
Russia has such a large coastal area as no other country in the world.
For 300 years, the navNavy has reliprotected Russia, said Putin at the day celebrated by sailors sailors throughout nationwide.
On many other Russian coastal towns, the navforces celebrated the Navy Day with parades.
In Syria, where Russia fat the side of rulBashar al-Assad, the military demonstrated in a arms show in the Mediterranean port of Tartu's strength.
Mammunition was fired.
A a video in a video by the Ministry of Defense was not only warships, including a submarine, but also combat helicopters and jets.
Hurricane "Hanna" reaches Texas: help because to Corona difficult
Washington - The first hurricane of this year's season over the Atlantic has landland in Texas.
Lie-threatening floods, strong winds and heavy rainfall now threatened parts of the US state, the National Hurriricane Center of the US NOAA the night at Sunday (local time).
Governor Greg Abbott called the emergency of emergency for numerous districts.
The Corona pandemic rTexas in Texas made the work of the helpers, Abbott continued according to US media.
Evacuated called to caution
"Every hurricane is an enormous challenge," said Abbott, according to the newspaper "Houston Chronicle".
Looking at the cyclone in Texas, he added: "This challenge is complicated and is exacerbated considering that it sweeps through an area that is the state's most affected by Covid-19"
According to Johns-Hopkins University, around 5,000 people of Corona pandemic, about 5,000 people died in Texas alone.
Abbott called people who would have to leave their homes to caution.
They should not disregard practices "we have accustomto", for such as wearing masks, the governor said, according to the station CBS.
It is important that all distance
Therefore, hotel rooms were also provided in some places.
It should also be tested in emergency accommodation on Corona.
Damage were only reported from the coastal town of Port Mansfield.
Storm warning withdrawn back again
With wind speeds of up to 150 kilometers per hour, "Hanna" was hit on land on the island of Padre Island right just off the Texas coast.
The tropical storm had previously been upgrato the hurricane of the lowest stage one.
For the coastal section from Port Mansfield to Sargent, a storm flood warning issued and later taken drawn.
Authorities expected a weakening, while "Hanna" continued further inthe and to the northeast of Mexico.
"Douglas" moves to
In the Pacific, Hurricane "Douglas" was the night at Sunday with wind speeds of around 150 kilometers per hour towards Hawaii.
However, the Hurricane expected it to weaken.
According to the forecast, it should be on Sunday (local time) near the largest islands of Hawaii - then as a storm just below the hurricane threshold.
Over the Atlantic, NOAA expects after a forecast tion of May an above-average active hurricane season.
From June to the end of November, up to ten hurricanes, of which up to six very strong cyclones.
On average, there are six ricanes per year over the Atlantic, three of which develop into storms of great strength.
Given to available climate data and the higher water temperature in the Atlantic and the Caribbean, the probof a normal season is only 30 percent, which of a under-average even only ten percent, it at was time.
US President Donald Trump wrote on Twitter that his government closely the storms and was in contact with the states.
Four goals removed missed: video assistant "punished" Sassu
Sassuolos Filip Djuricic were two goals
Naples - Four goals scored, four goals scored missed: Sassuolo Calcio experienced at the 0: 2 (0: 1) at the SSC Naples in the Italian football league A raevening - and was really sgry on the video assistant of the referee.
"A festival of ungiven gates for Sassuolo.
Never before the VAR has been so hard against a team, "commented the" Corriere dello Sport ".
Host host Naples had led by a goal of foreign defender Elseid Hisaj in the 8th minute, in the 32nd minute, Filip Djuricic first cheered the balance.
The Video Assistant Referee (VAR) took the hit due to a position.
Five minutes later, Djuricic shot the ball again into the net - again the VAR intervened.
The the gates of attackers Francesco Caputo (50th) and Domenico Berardi (61 1st), the referee team withdrew after the notice from the VAR.
In the afterseason, Allan made the 2 – 0 final result for Naples and the bitter evening for Sassuolo.
"The VAR is worse for Sassuolo than a radar trap on the road and punishes Sassuolo like no team before.
The new technology ensures records, "writes the" Gazzetta dello Sport "
FC Bayern München: Pavard
Munich (dpa) - The start into the hot preparation phase for the Champions League began for double defeat FC Bayern with a setback.
The after a short holiday and a training days "reasonably good", Hansi Flick has to think after the first team training, how he can convert his successful defense after the injury of world champion Benjamin Pavard.
The Frenchman, who has behind Captain Manuel Neuer and midfield chief Joshua Kimmich, the third minutes of minutes, suffered a band injury on the left foot root and threatens to be missing in decisive royal class duels.
In the Munich muddel weather, the legal defender broke a training game and was driven from the course with a golf kart.
How long the unrestricted regular player has to pause in the fight for the title is open.
A match in the eighth-final match against Chelsea on 8 August may be difficult possible, the 24-year-old hope for the final tournament on 12 August in Lisbon.
The BavBavaria do not want to stop from misfailure from the training on Sunday.
Flick called in his personal ple formula the three attributes he wants to see from his stars on his way to Portugal capital.
Quality, intensity and concentration are to show his vicorious ungry title collectors in the 28 days following 28 days until the royal class final on 23 August.
"We simply mastered the mandatory tasks with championship and cup.
Now it is important to create the special, "said Flick.
Until the Munich can deal with the final tournament and previously a training camp in the Algarve, it there is the eighth-final duty against Chelsea FC.
After the 3 – 0 in first leg before the Corona break, the Londoners should not the domestic nightmare like in the "final daho" like the" final dahoam in 2012.
"We have to go through the door.
We want to win, create good conditions and refuel trust with a good game, "demanded Flick.
A test for the match is be on Friday against Olympique Marseille que Marseille.
With a long speech, Flick had sworn his stars, who had 13 days after 13 the double holiday, on a unique August.
He welcomed 31 players on Säbener Straße, including the new players for fine shopping Leroy Sané, who met all new colleagues in the first time after his move from Manchester City.
"Leroy has joined well like all newones," Flick reported.
But instead of talking about the new season, if Sané & Co. are longer allowed to train, Flick preferred to talk about the current title project of the German series champion.
After days of individual and small group training, now trained in team strength for the Londoners, who are in the game rhythm to the flick ensemble.
After that, the Munich could face a quarter-finals against FC Barcelona and Lionel Messi, and in the semifinals, possible opponents are Real Madrid, Manchester City or Juventus Turin.
A way to the final in Lisbon "is not quite easy," stressed the head coach, who from Tuesday can rely trust on the services of his new assistant Miroslav Klose in the training.
The WM record shooter Klose and Flick know of many common tournament preparation, which is particularly important in the 0-to 100 tuning.
With his current team, working is "a pleasure", Flick praised.
The "focus on profits" is an impressive feature of his.
The tournament with ninth teams was also ambitious on Sunday.
Of the performance were all there, including the emigrate Thiago and defenseman David Alaba, whose stay is not secured beyond the royal class season.
The Formula 1 needs a special rule to select its
Since it cannot be driven on the required number of continents, the FIA has to improvise to award the World Cup titles.
All American races were cancelled.
Race calendar is becoming more and more concrete
The racing calendar of the current Formula 1 season continues to
To the ten confirmed Grand Prix, three other race tracks under the week.
In October, to be driven at the Nürburgring in Germany and in the Portuguese Portimão.
On the first, Lewis Hamilton and Co. fight for World points on the Italian traditional track in Imola.
This, the racing calendar in 2020 includes 13 runs.
"We are pleased that we continue to make great progress in completing our plans for the 2020 season," said Formula 1 boss Chase Carey.
In total of 15 to 18 races in 15 to 18 races will be completed in the royal class of motorsports.
The Formula 1 wants to complete its season in Asia.
The final racing calendar will be fixed and published in the coming weeks.
Prior to the officially scheduled races in Bahrain and Abu Dhabi in December, the media reports could still be take place in Vietnam and Malaysia at the end of November.
Regulations requires races on three continents
The regulations of Formula 1 requires at least of at least races on three continents.
Even if, as currently planned, only driven on two continents, there is to be a world champion.
With the help a special rule the FIA wants award the titles cto "extraordinary circumstances" because of the coronavirus pandemic.
The traditional season start in Australia in March had to be cancelled due to the emerging Coronona crisis.
A return to the continent later this year is not a issue.
In addition, the Formula 1 will not be in America this year.
Cancellation is criticism in Brazil
Due to the tense corona situation, the races will not take place in Canada, the USA, Mexico and Brazil.
"We look looking forward to back with them the next season," said Carey.
The cancellation of the American races was criticism, especially in Brazil: "The rejection was not surprising for us, but we can not accept the reasons," Tamas Rohonyi, promoter of the Grand Prix in São Paulo.
The number of infections in the São Paulo area are significantly lower than other regions of Brazil.
The concerns of some teams not want to drive in Brazil would not justify cancellation.
One be prepared for the required security measures.
Greta Thunberg: Bad look against Donald Trump went around the
Greta Thunberg spoke about her meeting with US President Donald Trump Donald Trump.
Greta Thunberg was guest in the famous latenight show by Stephen Colbert by video switching and revealed in interview what she had in mind during her encounter with Donald Trump.
Climate kivisor Greta Thunberg was guest by video switch in a popular US latenight show.
She told, among other things about her fight against the powerful of the world.
Also about her famous "evil look" in her encounter with Donald Trump, the teenager.
New York City - In the past two years, climate activist Greta Thunberg made attention with her tireless commitment to the "Fridays For Future" movement.
Now she spoke in a well-known latenight show about her plans in the future and her encounter with US President Donald Trump at the UN climate summit last year.
Latenight host Stephen Colbert welcomed the 17-year-old old Thunberg on Tuesday on Tuesday and conducted a longer interview with the Swedish
She spoke not only about her fight against climate change, but also about her conflict with the powerful of the world
"There are some things that have surprised me," she said.
"How far people go to steer the focus from the climate crisis," she has shook her.
"Everything from organized hate campaigns to threats, just because a group of children go to the street," she experienced.
Heads of state and leading politicians who mock them in social media or trying to silence, she "funny" as she show the reactions "because they have no other answer".
It became particularly interesting at the end of the interview when Greta Thunberg was addressed to a well-known scene in which gave US President Trump a bitterous look.
At the UN climate summit 2019 in New York, for which the nude sailed across the Atlantic, her expressive view was captured by the cameras and has been seen by countless people on the Internet.
The short clip resulted into a GIF, i.e. an animated image, which ultimately became one of the most commonly used images for Trump opponents.
But what did the 17-year-old think about the US president at this moment?
To the relatively opopen question of Stephen Colbert, she answered briefly undry: "To be honest, I think that does not need any further explanation".
With the satirist, the experienced satirist Colbert not expected and disappeared from the picture briefly laughing.
With her "How dare you?" speech on the principles of climate protection she remained in many at the Climate conference.
Ex-Dortmunder Immobile with ple for Lazio Rome
Ciro Immobile is now in the race for Europe's Golden shoe now with Bavaria's Robert Lewandowski.
The former Dortmunder Ciro Immobile has the best chances of becoming scorer in the Italian football championship.
The former BVB professional contributed three goals in the 5 – 1 (1: 1) victory of Lazio Rome near Hellas Verona, including two transformed penalty alties in the playtimes of both halves.
This, the 30-year-old has 34 seasons from the season games before the end now on his seasons - just as many scored Robert Lewandowski of FC Bayern Munich in the ired Bundesleague season.
In Italy, Cristiano Ronaldo follows with 30 goals, the Portuguese superstar met with the top rider in the evening on Sampdoria Genoa.
Fleetwood Mac co-founder Peter Green died
His life was like a rollercoaster: After a rapid ascent with Fleetwood Mac, it went steeply downhill and then slowly upwards.
Now the bluesrock guitarist Peter Green has died at the age of 73
Ingenious guitarist, drug junkie, cult followers: The co-founder of the band Fleetwood Mac, Peter Green, is dead
He had died peacefully sleep at the age of 73, family members told on Saturday in an official statement that another statement would be announced for the next few days.
Top musicians like Peter Frampton honored Green as one of the best blues and rock guitarists.
Mick Fleetwood spoke in an emotional reaction of a "monumental loss" for all previous and current members of the band Fleetwood Mac.
The drummer Fleetwood and the guitarist Green had founded the now legendary band in London in 1967, to this forgotten is his dreamy instrumental hit "Albatross".
The life of the musician (The End Of The Game "," In The Skies ") was a roller coaster.
With Fleetwood Mac, Green experienced a rapid rise - the band celebrated their greatest successes but then without him.
It is said to have been controdispute, because Green wanted to donate all the profits of the group for charity.
He began to perform in wide garbes and with a large crucifix.
Psychental problems are also to have played a role.
Three years after the founding, left the band in 1970.
A social descent.
The bluesrock guitarist suffered from drug abuse and schizophrenia, as biographers reported
For a long time, Green was treated in psychiatry.
During most part of the 1970s, the musician disappeared.
He is said to have lived on the street, worked as a cemetery gardener and spent for a time in an Israeli kibbutz.
Green was born in 1946 as the son of a Jewish workers family in the Bethnal Green district of London.
At a young age, he enthusiastic for US blumusicians such as B.B. King and Muddy Waters.
At the age, he learned the first guitar.
At the age of 15, the teenager began to play guitar and got five years later the chance to on stage as a lead guitarist for the instrumental band Peter B's Looners.
He later, he was as a replacement for his idol Eric Clapton in the Bluesbreakers.
In the middle of the blues oom, Green founded Fleetwood Fleetwood Mac together with his bluesbreakers colleagues Mick Fleetwood and John McVie.
The song by song "Albatross" gave the group the first number 1 hit in the winter of 1968 / 69 and catapulit to top of the British music scene.
But the rapid rise soon showed his shadow sides: Green did not cope the media rum, his experiments with the drug LSD became increasingly extreme.
He commented between music and addiction and adlater in an interview: "The worst that happened to me in life is the drugs - the best was to land a number 1 hit".
At the end of the decade, Green surprisingly achieved an eight success with an album inspired by religious themes.
Fleetwood Mac meanswam without him in new formation on a wave of success.
Their 1977 album "Rumours" was sold more than 40 million times around the world.
Despite various small solo successes, Green made no major comeback until he in 1996 with a group of musicians.
The British "Daily Telegraph" spoke at the time of a rock star returned to Earth.
Free of Drogen, Green released with the Peter Green Splinter Group several albums until the band dissolved in 2004.
For music experts he was a blues legend during his lifetime - and with his gentle sound, one of the most influential guitarists of the past decades.
